Ohio, session 136, SB94.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 3345.88 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 3345.88. (A) As used in this section : 6
(1) "University athletic event" means an intercollegiate 7
athletic competition in which a student-athlete or team of 8
student-athletes affiliated with a state university participate. 9
(2) "State university" has the same meaning as in section 10
3345.011 of the Revised Code. 11
(B) To the extent permitted by federal law, no state 12
university shall enter into or renew a contract under which the 13
media rights to broadcast a university athletic event are 14
granted exclusively to a streaming service. This division 15
applies only to contracts entered into or renewed on or after 16
the effective date of this section. 17
(C) Each state university shall provide enrolled students, 18

S. B. No. 94 Page 2
As Introduced
at no cost to the students, with access to observe any 19
university athletic events that are broadcast in accordance with 20
a contract entered into or renewed in accordance with division 21
(B) of this section. Each state university shall determine the 22
manner in which such access is provided to students. 23